Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB26.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 141.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018:
(1) "Adjusted gross income," in the case of taxpayers other than corporations, means
the amount calculated in KRS 141.019;
(2) "Captive real estate investment trust" means a real estate investment trust as defined
in Section 856 of the Internal Revenue Code that meets the following requirements:
(a) 1. The shares or other ownership interests of the real estate investment
trust are not regularly traded on an established securities market; or
2. The real estate investment trust does not have enough shareholders or
owners to be required to register with the Securities and Exchange
Commission;
(b) 1. The maximum amount of stock or other ownership interest that is owned
or constructively owned by a corporation equals or exceeds:
a. Twenty-five percent (25%), if the corporation does not occupy
property owned, constructively owned, or controlled by the real
estate investment trust; or
b. Ten percent (10%), if the corporation occupies property owned,
constructively owned, or controlled by the real estate investment
trust.
The total ownership interest of a corporation shall be determined by
aggregating all interests owned or constructively owned by a
corporation; and
2. For the purposes of this paragraph:
a. "Corporation" means a corporation taxable under KRS 141.040,
and includes an affiliated group as defined in KRS 141.200, that is
Page 1 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 276
required to file a consolidated return pursuant to KRS 141.200;
and
b. "Owned or constructively owned" means owning shares or having
an ownership interest in the real estate investment trust, or owning
an interest in an entity that owns shares or has an ownership
interest in the real estate investment trust. Constructive ownership
shall be determined by looking across multiple layers of a
multilayer pass-through structure; and
(c) The real estate investment trust is not owned by another real estate investment
trust;
(3) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the department;
(4) "Corporation" has the same meaning as in Section 7701(a)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code;
(5) "Critical infrastructure" means property and equipment owned or used by
communications networks, electric generation, transmission or distribution systems,
gas distribution systems, or water or wastewater pipelines that service multiple
customers or citizens, including but not limited to real and personal property such
as buildings, offices, lines, poles, pipes, structures, or equipment;
(6) "Declared state disaster or emergency" means a disaster or emergency event for
which:
(a) The Governor has declared a state of emergency pursuant to KRS 39A.100; or
(b) A presidential declaration of a federal major disaster or emergency has been
issued;
(7) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(8) "Dependent" means those persons defined as dependents in the Internal Revenue
Code;
(9) "Disaster or emergency-related work" means repairing, renovating, installing,
Page 2 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 276
building, or rendering services that are essential to the restoration of critical
infrastructure that has been damaged, impaired, or destroyed by a declared state
disaster or emergency;
(10) "Disaster response business" means any entity:
(a) That has no presence in the state and conducts no business in the state, except
for disaster or emergency-related work during a disaster response period;
(b) Whose services are requested by a registered business or by a state or local
government for purposes of performing disaster or emergency-related work in
the state during a disaster response period; and
(c) That has no registrations, tax filings, or nexus in this state other than disaster
or emergency-related work during the calendar year immediately preceding
the declared state disaster or emergency;
(11) "Disaster response employee" means an employee who does not work or reside in
the state, except for disaster or emergency-related work during the disaster response
period;
(12) "Disaster response period" means a period that begins ten (10) days prior to the first
day of the Governor's declaration under KRS 39A.100, or the President's
declaration of a federal major disaster or emergency, whichever occurs first, and
that extends thirty (30) calendar days after the declared state disaster or emergency;
(13) "Doing business in this state" includes but is not limited to:
(a) Being organized under the laws of this state;
(b) Having a commercial domicile in this state;
(c) Owning or leasing property in this state;
(d) Having one (1) or more individuals performing services in this state;
(e) Maintaining an interest in a pass-through entity doing business in this state;
(f) Deriving income from or attributable to sources within this state, including
deriving income directly or indirectly from a trust doing business in this state,
Page 3 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 276
or deriving income directly or indirectly from a single-member limited
liability company that is doing business in this state and is disregarded as an
entity separate from its single member for federal income tax purposes; or
(g) Directing activities at Kentucky customers for the purpose of selling them
goods or services.
Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted in a manner that goes beyond the
limitations imposed and protections provided by the United States Constitution or
Pub. L. No. 86-272;
(14) "Employee" has the same meaning as in Section 3401(c) of the Internal Revenue
Code;
(15) "Employer" has the same meaning as in Section 3401(d) of the Internal Revenue
Code;
(16) "Fiduciary" has the same meaning as in Section 7701(a)(6) of the Internal Revenue
Code;
(17) "Financial institution" means:
(a) A national bank organized as a body corporate and existing or in the process
of organizing as a national bank association pursuant to the provisions of the
National Bank Act, 12 U.S.C. sec.[secs.] 21 et seq., in effect on December 31,
1997, exclusive of any amendments made subsequent to that date;
(b) Any bank or trust company incorporated or organized under the laws of any
state, except a banker's bank organized under KRS 286.3-135;
(c) Any corporation organized under the provisions of 12 U.S.C. secs. 611 to 631,
in effect on December 31, 1997, exclusive of any amendments made
subsequent to that date, or any corporation organized after December 31,
1997, that meets the requirements of 12 U.S.C. secs. 611 to 631, in effect on
December 31, 1997; or
(d) Any agency or branch of a foreign depository as defined in 12 U.S.C. sec.
Page 4 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 276
3101, in effect on December 31, 1997, exclusive of any amendments made
subsequent to that date, or any agency or branch of a foreign depository
established after December 31, 1997, that meets the requirements of 12 U.S.C.
sec. 3101 in effect on December 31, 1997;
(18) "Fiscal year" has the same meaning as in Section 7701(a)(24) of the Internal
Revenue Code;
(19) "Gross income":
(a) In the case of taxpayers other than corporations, has the same meaning as in
Section 61 of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(b) In the case of corporations, means the amount calculated in KRS 141.039;
(20) "Individual" means a natural person;
(21) "Internal Revenue Code" means for taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2024, the Internal Revenue Code in effect on December 31, 2023, exclusive of any
amendments made subsequent to that date, other than amendments that extend
provisions in effect on December 31, 2023, that would otherwise terminate;
(22) "Limited liability pass-through entity" means any pass-through entity that affords
any of its partners, members, shareholders, or owners, through function of the laws
of this state or laws recognized by this state, protection from general liability for
actions of the entity;
(23) "Modified gross income" means the greater of:
(a) Adjusted gross income as defined in 26 U.S.C. sec. 62, including any
amendments in effect on December 31 of the taxable year, and adjusted as
follows:
1. Include interest income derived from obligations of sister states and
political subdivisions thereof; and
2. Include lump-sum pension distributions taxed under the special
transition rules of Pub. L. No. 104-188, sec. 1401(c)(2); or
Page 5 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 276
(b) Adjusted gross income as defined in subsection (1) of this section and
adjusted to include lump-sum pension distributions taxed under the special
transition rules of Pub. L. No. 104-188, sec. 1401(c)(2);
(24) "Net income":
(a) In the case of taxpayers other than corporations, means the amount calculated
in KRS 141.019; and
(b) In the case of corporations, means the amount calculated in KRS 141.039;
(25) "Nonresident" means any individual not a resident of this state;
(26) "Number of withholding exemptions claimed" means the number of withholding
exemptions claimed in a withholding exemption certificate in effect under KRS
141.325, except that if no such certificate is in effect, the number of withholding
exemptions claimed shall be considered to be zero;
(27) "Overtime compensation" means the amount paid to an employee, in accordance
with the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended, 29 U.S.C. sec. 201 et.
seq., for his or her employment in excess of forty (40) hours in a work week at a
rate of not less than one and one-half (1-1/2) times the regular rate of pay;
(28) "Part-year resident" means any individual that has established or abandoned
Kentucky residency during the calendar year;
(29)[(28)] "Pass-through entity" means any partnership, S corporation, limited liability
company, limited liability partnership, limited partnership, or similar entity
recognized by the laws of this state that is not taxed for federal purposes at the
entity level, but instead passes to each partner, member, shareholder, or owner their
proportionate share of income, deductions, gains, losses, credits, and any other
similar attributes;
(30)[(29)] "Payroll period" has the same meaning as in Section 3401(b) of the Internal
Revenue Code;
(31)[(30)] "Person" has the same meaning as in Section 7701(a)(1) of the Internal
Page 6 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 276
Revenue Code;
(32)[(31)] "Registered business" means a business entity that owns or otherwise
possesses critical infrastructure and that is registered to do business in the state
prior to the declared state disaster or emergency;
(33)[(32)] "Resident" means an individual domiciled within this state or an individual
who is not domiciled in this state, but maintains a place of abode in this state and
spends in the aggregate more than one hundred eighty-three (183) days of the
taxable year in this state;
(34)[(33)] "S corporation" has the same meaning as in Section 1361(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code;
(35)[(34)] "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the
Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any territory or possession of the United States;
(36)[(35)] "Taxable net income":
(a) In the case of corporations that are taxable in this state, means "net income" as
defined in subsection (24) of this section;
(b) In the case of corporations that are taxable in this state and taxable in another
state, means "net income" as defined in subsection (24) of this section and as
allocated and apportioned under KRS 141.120;
(c) For homeowners' associations as defined in Section 528(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code, means "taxable income" as defined in Section 528(d) of the
Internal Revenue Code. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (21) of
this section, the Internal Revenue Code sections referred to in this paragraph
shall be those code sections in effect for the applicable tax year; and
(d) For a corporation that meets the requirements established under Section 856
of the Internal Revenue Code to be a real estate investment trust, means "real
estate investment trust taxable income" as defined in Section 857(b)(2) of the
Internal Revenue Code, except that a captive real estate investment trust shall
Page 7 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 276
not be allowed any deduction for dividends paid;
(37)[(36)] "Taxable year" means the calendar year or fiscal year ending during such
calendar year, upon the basis of which net income is computed, and in the case of a
return made for a fractional part of a year under the provisions of this chapter or
under administrative regulations prescribed by the commissioner, "taxable year"
means the period for which the return is made;[ and]
(38)[(37)] "Tips" means:
(a) The amounts reported to an employer in accordance with Section 6053(a) of
the Internal Revenue Code and includes:
1. Cash tips received directly from customers;
2. Tips from customers who leave a tip through electronic settlement or
payment;
3. The value of any noncash tips; and
4. Tip amounts received from other employees paid out through tip pools,
tip splitting, or other tip-sharing arrangements; and
(b) Allocated tips assigned to the employee by their employer and included in
gross income; and
(39) "Wages" has the same meaning as in Section 3401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code
and includes other income subject to withholding as provided in Section 3401(f)
and Section 3402(k), (o), (p), (q), and (s) of the Internal Revenue Code, but does
not include:
(a) Tips; or
(b) Overtime compensation.
Section 2. KRS 141.019 is amended to read as follows:
In the case of taxpayers other than corporations:
(1) Adjusted gross income shall be calculated by subtracting from the gross income of
those taxpayers the deductions allowed individuals by Section 62 of the Internal
Page 8 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 276
Revenue Code and adjusting as follows:
(a) Exclude income that is exempt from state taxation by the Kentucky
Constitution and the Constitution and statutory laws of the United States;
(b) Exclude income from supplemental annuities provided by the Railroad
Retirement Act of 1937 as amended and which are subject to federal income
tax by Pub. L. No. 89-699;
(c) Include interest income derived from obligations of sister states and political
subdivisions thereof;
(d) Exclude employee pension contributions picked up as provided for in KRS
6.505, 16.545, 21.360, 61.523, 61.560, 65.155, 67A.320, 67A.510, 78.610,
and 161.540 upon a ruling by the Internal Revenue Service or the federal
courts that these contributions shall not be included as gross income until such
time as the contributions are distributed or made available to the employee;
(e) Exclude Social Security and railroad retirement benefits subject to federal
income tax;
(f) Exclude any money received because of a settlement or judgment in a lawsuit
brought against a manufacturer or distributor of "Agent Orange" for damages
resulting from exposure to Agent Orange by a member or veteran of the
Armed Forces of the United States or any dependent of such person who
served in Vietnam;
(g) 1. a. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2005, but before
January 1, 2018, exclude up to forty-one thousand one hundred ten
dollars ($41,110) of total distributions from pension plans, annuity
contracts, profit-sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee
savings plans; and
b. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, exclude
up to thirty-one thousand one hundred ten dollars ($31,110) of
Page 9 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 276
total distributions from pension plans, annuity contracts, profit-
sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee savings plans.
2. As used in this paragraph:
a. "Annuity contract" has the same meaning as set forth in Section
1035 of the Internal Revenue Code;
b. "Distributions" includes but is not limited to any lump-sum
distribution from pension or profit-sharing plans qualifying for the
income tax averaging provisions of Section 402 of the Internal
Revenue Code; any distribution from an individual retirement
account as defined in Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code;
and any disability pension distribution; and
c. "Pension plans, profit-sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee
savings plans" means any trust or other entity created or organized
under a written retirement plan and forming part of a stock bonus,
pension, or profit-sharing plan of a public or private employer for
the exclusive benefit of employees or their beneficiaries and
includes plans qualified or unqualified under Section 401 of the
Internal Revenue Code and individual retirement accounts as
defined in Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(h) 1. a. Exclude the portion of the distributive share of a shareholder's net
income from an S corporation subject to the franchise tax imposed
under KRS 136.505 or the capital stock tax imposed under KRS
136.300; and
b. Exclude the portion of the distributive share of a shareholder's net
income from an S corporation related to a qualified subchapter S
subsidiary subject to the franchise tax imposed under KRS
136.505 or the capital stock tax imposed under KRS 136.300.
Page 10 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 276
2. The shareholder's basis of stock held in an S corporation where the S
corporation or its qualified subchapter S subsidiary is subject to the
franchise tax imposed under KRS 136.505 or the capital stock tax
imposed under KRS 136.300 shall be the same as the basis for federal
income tax purposes;
(i) Exclude income received for services performed as a precinct worker for
election training or for working at election booths in state, county, and local
primaries or regular or special elections;
(j) Exclude any capital gains income attributable to property taken by eminent
domain;
(k) 1. Exclude all income from all sources for members of the Armed Forces
who are on active duty and who are killed in the line of duty, for the
year during which the death occurred and the year prior to the year
during which the death occurred.
2. For the purposes of this paragraph, "all income from all sources" shall
include all federal and state death benefits payable to the estate or any
beneficiaries;
(l) Exclude all military pay received by members of the Armed Forces while on
active duty;
(m) 1. Include the amount deducted for depreciation under 26 U.S.C. sec. 167
or 168; and
2. Exclude the amounts allowed by KRS 141.0101 for depreciation;
(n) Include the amount deducted under 26 U.S.C. sec. 199A;
(o) Ignore any change in the cost basis of the surviving spouse's share of property
owned by a Kentucky community property trust occurring for federal income
tax purposes as a result of the death of the predeceasing spouse;
(p) Allow the same treatment allowed under Pub. L. No. 116-260, secs. 276 and
Page 11 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 276
278, related to the tax treatment of forgiven covered loans, deductions
attributable to those loans, and tax attributes associated with those loans for
taxable years ending on or after March 27, 2020, but before January 1, 2022;
[and]
(q) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, but before March 11,
2023, allow the same treatment of restaurant revitalization grants in
accordance with Pub. L. No. 117-2, sec. 9673 and 15 U.S.C. sec. 9009c,
related to the tax treatment of the grants, deductions attributable to those
grants, and tax attributes associated with those grants; and
(r) 1. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, but before
January 1, 2030, exclude:
a. Tips; and
b. Overtime compensation.
2. In order for the General Assembly to evaluate the effectiveness of
these income exclusions, the department shall report the following
information to the Legislative Research Commission and the Interim
Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue on or before
November 1, 2027, and on or before each November 1 thereafter as
long as these exclusions are claimed on a return:
a. The location of the taxpayer, by county, as reflected on the
return as filed for the taxable year;
b. The amount of the exclusions claimed by a taxpayer for the
taxable year;
c. The total cumulative amount of the exclusion of tips or overtime
compensation allowed for the taxable year; and
d. Based on ranges of adjusted gross income of no larger than five
thousand dollars ($5,000) for the taxable year, the total amount
Page 12 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 276
of exclusions allowed and the total number of returns claiming
an exclusion of tips or overtime compensation.
3. The information required to be reported under this paragraph shall
not be considered confidential taxpayer information and shall not be
subject to KRS Chapter 131 or any other provisions of the Kentucky
Revised Statutes prohibiting disclosure or reporting of information;
and
(2) Net income shall be calculated by subtracting from adjusted gross income all the
deductions allowed individuals by Chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code, as
modified by KRS 141.0101, except:
(a) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 164 for taxes;
(b) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 165 for losses, except wagering
losses allowed under Section 165(d) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(c) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 213 for medical care expenses;
(d) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 217 for moving expenses;
(e) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 67 for any other miscellaneous
deduction;
(f) Any deduction allowed by the Internal Revenue Code for amounts allowable
under KRS 140.090(1)(h) in calculating the value of the distributive shares of
the estate of a decedent, unless there is filed with the income return a
statement that the deduction has not been claimed under KRS 140.090(1)(h);
(g) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 151 for personal exemptions and
any other deductions in lieu thereof;
(h) Any deduction allowed for amounts paid to any club, organization, or
establishment which has been determined by the courts or an agency
established by the General Assembly and charged with enforcing the civil
rights laws of the Commonwealth, not to afford full and equal membership
Page 13 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 276
and full and equal enjoyment of its goods, services, facilities, privileges,
advantages, or accommodations to any person because of race, color, religion,
national origin, or sex, except nothing shall be construed to deny a deduction
for amounts paid to any religious or denominational club, group, or
establishment or any organization operated solely for charitable or educational
purposes which restricts membership to persons of the same religion or
denomination in order to promote the religious principles for which it is
established and maintained; and
(i) A taxpayer may elect to claim the standard deduction allowed by KRS
141.081 instead of itemized deductions allowed pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 63
and as modified by this section.
Section 3. KRS 141.335 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person required to deduct and withhold from an employee a tax under KRS
141.310 or 141.315, or who would have been required to deduct and withhold a tax
under KRS 141.310 or 141.315 if the employee had claimed no more than one (1)
withholding exemption, shall furnish to each[ such] employee in respect of the
remuneration paid by the[such] person to the[such] employee during the calendar
year, on or before January 31 of the succeeding year, or, if his or her employment
is terminated before the close of the[such] calendar year, on the day on which the
last payment of remuneration is made, a written statement showing the[ following]:
(a) [the ]Name of the[such] person;
(b) [the ]Name of the employee and his or her Social Security[ account] number;
(c) [the ]Total amount of wages;[ as defined in KRS 141.010; and]
(d) Total amount of tips;
(e) Total amount of overtime compensation; and
(f) [the ]Total amount deducted and withheld as tax under KRS 141.310 and
141.315.
Page 14 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 276
(2) The statement required to be furnished by this section in respect of any wages shall
be furnished at such other times, shall contain such other information, and shall be
in such form as the department may by regulations prescribe. A duplicate of such
statement if made and filed in accordance with regulations prescribed by the
department shall constitute the return required to be made in respect of such wages
under KRS 141.150.
(3) The department may promulgate regulations providing for reasonable extensions of
time, not in excess of thirty (30) days, to employers required to furnish statements
under this section.
Section 4. KRS 131.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No present or former commissioner or employee of the department, present or
former member of a county board of assessment appeals, present or former property
valuation administrator or employee, present or former secretary or employee of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet, former secretary or employee of the Revenue
Cabinet, or any other person, shall intentionally and without authorization inspect
or divulge any information acquired by him or her of the affairs of any person, or
information regarding the tax schedules, returns, or reports required to be filed with
the department or other proper officer, or any information produced by a hearing or
investigation, insofar as the information may have to do with the affairs of the
person's business.
(2) The prohibition established by subsection (1) of this section shall not extend to:
(a) Information required in prosecutions for making false reports or returns of
property for taxation, or any other infraction of the tax laws;
(b) Any matter properly entered upon any assessment record, or in any way made
a matter of public record;
(c) Furnishing any taxpayer or his or her properly authorized agent with
information respecting his or her own return;
Page 15 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 276
(d) Testimony provided by the commissioner or any employee of the department
in any court, or the introduction as evidence of returns or reports filed with the
department, in an action for violation of state or federal tax laws or in any
action challenging state or federal tax laws;
(e) Providing an owner of unmined coal, oil or gas reserves, and other mineral or
energy resources assessed under KRS 132.820, or owners of surface land
under which the unmined minerals lie, factual information about the owner's
property derived from third-party returns filed for that owner's property, under
the provisions of KRS 132.820, that is used to determine the owner's
assessment. This information shall be provided to the owner on a confidential
basis, and the owner shall be subject to the penalties provided in KRS
131.990(2). The third-party filer shall be given prior notice of any disclosure
of information to the owner that was provided by the third-party filer;
(f) Providing to a third-party purchaser pursuant to an order entered in a
foreclosure action filed in a court of competent jurisdiction, factual
information related to the owner or lessee of coal, oil, gas reserves, or any
other mineral resources assessed under KRS 132.820. The department may
promulgate an administrative regulation establishing a fee schedule for the
provision of the information described in this paragraph. Any fee imposed
shall not exceed the greater of the actual cost of providing the information or
ten dollars ($10);
(g) Providing information to a licensing agency, the Transportation Cabinet, or
the Kentucky Supreme Court under KRS 131.1817;
(h) Statistics of gasoline and special fuels gallonage reported to the department
under KRS 138.210 to 138.448;
(i) Providing any utility gross receipts license tax return information that is
necessary to administer the provisions of KRS 160.613 to 160.617 to
Page 16 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 276
applicable school districts on a confidential basis;
(j) Providing documents, data, or other information to a third party pursuant to an
order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(k) Publishing administrative writings on its official website in accordance with
KRS 131.020(1)(b); or
(l) Providing information to the Legislative Research Commission under:
1. KRS 139.519 for purposes of the sales and use tax refund on building
materials used for disaster recovery;
2. KRS 141.436 for purposes of the energy efficiency products credits;
3. KRS 141.437 for purposes of the ENERGY STAR home and the
ENERGY STAR manufactured home credits;
4. KRS 141.383 for purposes of the film industry incentives;
5. KRS 154.26-095 for purposes of the Kentucky industrial revitalization
credit[tax credits] and the job assessment fees;
6. KRS 141.068 for purposes of the Kentucky investment fund;
7. KRS 141.396 for purposes of the angel investor [tax ]credit;
8. KRS 141.389 for purposes of the distilled spirits credit;
9. KRS 141.408 for purposes of the inventory credit;
10. KRS 141.390 for purposes of the recycling and composting
credits[credit];
11. KRS 141.3841 for purposes of the selling farmer [tax ]credit;
12. KRS 141.4231 for purposes of the renewable chemical production [tax
]credit;
13. KRS 141.524 for purposes of the Education Opportunity Account
Program [tax ]credit;
14. KRS 141.398 for purposes of the development area [tax ]credit;
15. KRS 139.516 for the purposes of the sales and use tax exemptions
Page 17 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 276
for[exemption on] the commercial mining of cryptocurrency;
16. KRS 141.419 for purposes of the decontamination [tax ]credit;
17. KRS 141.391 for purposes of the qualified broadband investment[ tax]
credit;[ and]
18. KRS 139.499 for purposes of the sales and use tax
exemptions[exemption] for a qualified data center project; and
19. Section 2 of this Act for purposes of the income tax exclusions for tips
and overtime compensation.
(3) The commissioner shall make available any information for official use only and on
a confidential basis to the proper officer, agency, board or commission of this state,
any Kentucky county, any Kentucky city, any other state, or the federal
government, under reciprocal agreements whereby the department shall receive
similar or useful information in return.
(4) Access to and inspection of information received from the Internal Revenue Service
is for department use only, and is restricted to tax administration purposes.
Information received from the Internal Revenue Service shall not be made available
to any other agency of state government, or any county, city, or other state, and
shall not be inspected intentionally and without authorization by any present
secretary or employee of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, commissioner or
employee of the department, or any other person.
(5) Statistics of crude oil as reported to the department under the crude oil excise tax
requirements of KRS Chapter 137 and statistics of natural gas production as
reported to the department under the natural resources severance tax requirements
of KRS Chapter 143A may be made public by the department by release to the
Energy and Environment Cabinet, Department for Natural Resources.
(6) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning with mine-map
submissions for the 1989 tax year, the department may make public or divulge only
Page 18 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 276
those portions of mine maps submitted by taxpayers to the department pursuant to
KRS Chapter 132 for ad valorem tax purposes that depict the boundaries of mined-
out parcel areas. These electronic maps shall not be relied upon to determine actual
boundaries of mined-out parcel areas. Property boundaries contained in mine maps
required under KRS Chapters 350 and 352 shall not be construed to constitute land
surveying or boundary surveys as defined by KRS 322.010 and any administrative
regulations promulgated thereto.
Page 19 of 19
XXXX 1/2/2025 2:42 PM Jacketed